Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2704
License required; exceptions.

After September 1, 2007, no person shall practice perfusion, whether or not compensation is received or expected, unless the person holds a license to practice perfusion under the Perfusion Practice Act, except that nothing in the act shall be construed to:

(1) Prohibit any person credentialed to practice under any other law from engaging in the practice for which he or she is credentialed;

(2) Prohibit any student enrolled in a bona fide perfusion training program recognized by the board from performing those duties which are necessary for the student's course of study, if the duties are performed under the supervision and direction of a perfusionist who is on duty and immediately available in the assigned patient care area; or

(3) Prohibit any person from practicing perfusion within the scope of his or her official duties when employed by an agency, bureau, or division of the federal government, serving in the armed forces or the Public Health Service of the United States, or employed by the Veterans Administration.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 11;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,393.